District of Columbia statutes.
10-1203.07

Collection and transfer of taxes to Washington Convention Center Fund.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law, surtaxes and dedicated taxes shall be collected by the Mayor, pursuant to §§ 47-1807.02(a)(4), 47-1807.02a [repealed], 47-1808.03(a)(4), 47-1808.03a [repealed], 47-2002.02, 47-2002.03, 47-2202.01, 47-2202.02, the provisions of which are incorporated by reference in this section, and transferred to the Washington Convention Center Fund for the purposes set forth in § 10-1202.08 until any of these provisions are repealed by legislation enacted after September 27, 1996.

(b)

This section shall apply as of September 27, 1996.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 307
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 21, 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(r), 57 DCR 181
This section is referenced in § 10-1601.02 and § 47-2002.05.
1981 Ed., § 9-833.
D.C. Law 18-111, in the section heading and subsec. (a), deleted “Authority” following “Center”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(r) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(r) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).